South Dakota, session 2026, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Board of Regents may contract for the planning, site preparation,
construction, completion, furnishing, equipping, and maintaining of a soccer venue at South
Dakota State University, together with any heating, air conditioning, plumbing, water, sewer,
electrical, sidewalks, parking, landscaping, and envelope systems, architectural and
engineering services, and any other services or actions as may be required for an estimated
cost of $5,040,000.
Section 2. There is appropriated to the Board of Regents, for the purposes authorized in this
Act, the sum of $5,040,000 in other fund expenditure authority for donated moneys, together
with any additional sums received pursuant to section 4 of this Act, and permitted adjustments
pursuant to section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. The cost estimate contained in this Act is stated in terms of 2026 values. The
Board of Regents may adjust the cost estimate to reflect inflation, as measured by the Building
Cost Index and reported by the Engineering News Record, and additional expenditures
required to comply with regulations adopted after the effective date of this Act, or additional
sums received pursuant to section 4 of this Act. Any adjustment to the construction cost
estimate for the project may not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the estimated
project construction cost stated in section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. The Board of Regents may accept, transfer, and expend any moneys obtained for
the project authorized in this Act from federal sources, donations, or any other external
sources, all of which comprise a special fund for the benefited project. All moneys deposited
into that fund are appropriated to the Board of Regents for the project authorized in this Act,
subject to limitations stated in sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this Act.

26.572.10 2 117
Section 5. No indebtedness, bond, or obligation incurred or created under the authority of
this Act may be or may become a lien, charge, or liability against this state, nor against the
property or funds of this state, within the meaning of the state's constitution and laws.
Section 6. The administration of the design and construction of the project authorized in this
Act shall be under the general charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration as provided in chapter 5-14.
Section 7. The executive director of the Board of Regents, shall approve vouchers, and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 8. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 9. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
SB117 ENROLLED

26.572.10 3 117
An Act to make an appropriation for the design and construction of a new soccer venue at
South Dakota State University and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 117
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 117 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB117 ENROLLED